Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1 H AZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT
12-8-68. Requirement of financial responsibility for persons operating or maintaining hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal facility; hazardous waste facility trust fund.

No hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal facility shall be operated or maintained by any person unless adequate financial responsibility, by bonding or other methods approved by the director, has been demonstrated to the director to ensure the satisfactory maintenance, operation, closure, and postclosure care of the facility, any corrective action which may be required as a condition of a permit, and payment of any liabilities to third parties as set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to this part.

The director may require the demonstration of financial responsibility prior to issuing a permit for any hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal facility to assure the availability of funds to meet sufficiently the requirements for proper closure, maintenance, or postclosure care of the facility and the hazardous waste contained therein, to assure any corrective action required as a condition of such a permit, and to guarantee payment of any liabilities to third parties as set forth in regulations adopted pursuant to this part. The director is authorized to establish the financial responsibility requirements for permit applicants and classes of permit applicants, including the establishment of a range of monetary amounts.

The board may adopt rules and regulations pursuant to this article establishing the criteria for approval, time periods for coverage, and other terms and conditions for the demonstration of financial responsibility required by this article and for the implementation of financial responsibility instruments.

If the director determines that a hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal facility has been abandoned, that the owner or operator thereof has become insolvent, or that for any other reason there is a demonstrated inability of the owner or operator to maintain, operate, or close the facility, to carry out postclosure care of the facility, or to carry out corrective action required as a condition of a permit, to the satisfaction of the director, the director may implement the applicable financial responsibility instruments. The proceeds from any applicable financial responsibility instruments shall be deposited in a special account designated as the hazardous waste facility trust fund. The director shall serve as trustee of any such hazardous waste facility trust fund and the funds deposited in any such fund shall be used only for closure, postclosure care, or corrective action required for the facility. The determination of whether there has been an abandonment, default, or other refusal or inability to perform and comply with closure, postclosure, or corrective action requirements shall be made by the director.

An order or other action of the director under this Code section shall become final unless a petition for hearing in accordance with Code Section 12-8-73 is filed.

In any case where the owner or operator is in bankruptcy, reorganization, or arrangement pursuant to the federal Bankruptcy Code or where, with reasonable diligence, jurisdiction in any state court or any federal court cannot be obtained over an owner or operator likely to be solvent at the time of judgment, any claim arising from conduct for which evidence of financial responsibility must be provided under this Code section may be asserted directly against the guarantor providing such evidence of financial responsibility. In the case of any action pursuant to this subsection, such guarantor shall be entitled to invoke all rights and defenses which would have been available to the owner or operator if any action had been brought against the owner or operator by the claimant and which will have been available to the guarantor if an action had been brought against the guarantor by the owner or operator.

The total liability of any guarantor shall be limited to the aggregate amount which the guarantor has provided as evidence of financial responsibility to the owner or operator under this part. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit any other state or federal statutory contractual or common law liability of a guarantor to its owner or operator including, but not limited to, the liability of such guarantor for bad faith either in negotiating or in failing to negotiate the settlement of any claim. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to diminish the liability of any person under Section 107 or 111 of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 or other, applicable law.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 10; Ga. L. 1985, p. 266, § 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 761, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

U.S. Code.

- The federal Bankruptcy Code, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 11 U.S.C.

§

1 et seq. The federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, referred to in this Code section, is codified throughout Titles 26, 42, and 49 U.S.C.

12-8-69. Variances.

Unless variances are prohibited by the federal act or the standards, rules, and regulations promulgated thereunder, the director may grant variances from the requirements of this article or the rules and regulations effective under this article whenever the director finds that compliance with any provision of this article or any standard, rule, or regulation will result in an arbitrary and unreasonable taking of property or will result, in effect, in the closing and elimination of any lawful business, occupation, or activity without sufficient corresponding benefit or advantage to the public, provided that no variance shall be granted where the effect of a variance will permit the continuation of a condition which poses an undue present or potential threat to the environment or to the health of humans; provided, further, that any variance so granted shall not be construed so as to relieve any person from any liability imposed by law or rule and regulation.

Variances may be granted for such periods of time and under such provisions and conditions as shall be specified by the director.

As a condition precedent to the issuance of a variance, the director may require the filing of a bond in accordance with Code Section 12-8-68, sufficient to ensure compliance with the terms and conditions of the variance. The director may require that the bond shall remain in effect until all terms and conditions of the variance are met and compliance is achieved with this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under this article.

Upon failure of a person to comply with the terms and conditions of any bond or any variance issued by the director, a variance may be amended, modified, suspended, or revoked, or the bond may be forfeited by the director or ordered to be modified or amended. The proceeds from any forfeited bond shall be deposited in either the hazardous waste facility trust fund in accordance with Code Section 12-8-68 or the hazardous waste trust fund in accordance with Code Section 12-8-91, as the director deems appropriate.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 11; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 483, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

12-8-70. Inspections and investigations.

The director or the director's authorized representative, upon presentation of his credentials, shall have a right to enter upon, to, or through premises of persons subject to this article, or premises whereon a violation of the article or rules and regulations is reasonably believed to be occurring or is reasonably believed to be about to occur, to investigate, take samples, copy all records relating to hazardous wastes, and inspect for compliance with the requirements imposed under this article or the rules and regulations or to determine whether such a violation or threatened violation exists in accordance with the following purposes:

For the purpose of determining whether any person subject to the requirements of this article is in compliance with any standard or requirement imposed pursuant to this article;

For the purpose of investigating conditions relating to hazardous waste management or hazardous waste management practices where the director is in possession of information sufficient to form a reasonable belief that a violation of this article or the rules and regulations is occurring or is about to occur;

For the purpose of determining whether there has been a violation of any of the provisions of this article, the rules and regulations promulgated under this article, or any permit or order issued pursuant to this article and the rules and regulations; or

For the purpose of determining whether a release of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances is occurring or has occurred.

In the event any person does not consent to an inspection or investigation, the director or his authorized representative may seek to obtain a warrant authorizing the inspection or investigation.

Each such inspection or investigation shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness. If the director or his authorized representatives obtain any samples prior to leaving the premises, he or they shall give to the owner, operator, or agent in charge a receipt describing the sample obtained and, if requested, a portion of each such sample equal in volume or weight to the portion retained. If any analysis is made of such samples, a copy of the results of such analysis shall be furnished promptly to the owner, operator, or agent in charge.

Any person whom the agency has reason to believe is contributing to or may have contributed to or may be responsible for a release of or the disposal of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances or who is the owner of real property where a release or disposal has occurred or is suspected to have occurred, when requested by the director, shall furnish to the director any information which that person may have or may reasonably obtain which is relevant to the release and has been requested by the director.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

12-8-71. Proceedings for enforcement.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this part, a violation of any rule or regulation of the board, or a violation of any order of the director has occurred, the director shall attempt to remedy the same by conference, conciliation, and persuasion. In the case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to correct or remedy any violation, the director may issue an order directed to such violator or violators. The order shall specify the provisions of this part, the rules and regulations, or the order alleged to have been violated and may direct that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in the order.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that there is or has been a release of hazardous waste or hazardous constituents into the environment, regardless of the time at which release of such hazardous waste or hazardous constituents occurred, and has reason to believe that such release poses a danger to health or the environment, the director shall attempt to obtain corrective action for such release by conference, conciliation, and persuasion. In the case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to obtain corrective action, the director may issue an order directed to any person, including any past or present generator, past or present transporter, or past or present owner or operator of a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility, who has contributed or who is contributing to such release. The order may direct that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in the order.

Any order issued by the director under this Code section shall be signed by the director. Any such order shall become final unless the person or persons named therein request in writing a hearing pursuant to Code Section 12-8-73.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 13; Ga. L. 1985, p. 266, § 7; Ga. L. 1988, p. 727, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-72. Application for injunctive relief.

Whenever, in the judgment of the director, any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or would constitute a violation of this article, the rules and regulations, or any order or permit conditions, he may apply to the superior court of the county in which the violative act or practice has been or is about to be engaged in, or in which jurisdiction is appropriate, for an order enjoining such act or practice or for an order requiring compliance with the article, the rules and regulations, or the order or permit condition. Upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such violative act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing the lack of an adequate remedy at law.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 14; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-73. Hearings on contested matters; judicial review.

All hearings on and the review of contested matters, orders, or permits and all hearings on and the review of any other enforcement actions or orders under this article shall be provided and conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2. The hearing and review procedure herein provided is to the exclusion of all other means of hearing or review.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 15; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-74. Judgment in accordance with final orders.

Any order of the hearing officer issued after a hearing as provided in Code Section 12-8-73 or any order of the director issued pursuant to Code Section 12-8-71 or 12-8-96, either unappealed from as provided in those Code sections or affirmed or modified on any review or appeal pursuant to Code Section 12-8-73, and from which no further review is taken or allowed under Code Section 12-8-73, may be filed, as unappealed from or as affirmed or modified, if reviewed or appealed, by certified copy from the director in the superior court of the county wherein the person under order resides, or if such person is a corporation in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county wherein the violation occurred or in which jurisdiction is appropriate, whereupon such superior court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though such judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 16; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-75. Powers of director in situations involving imminent and substantial endangerment to environment or to public health.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, the director, upon receipt of evidence that the past or present handling, storage, treatment, transportation, or disposal of any solid waste or hazardous waste is presenting or may present imminent and substantial endangerment to the environment or to the health of humans, may bring an action as provided in Code Section 12-8-72 to restrain immediately any person, including any past or present generator, past or present transporter, or past or present owner or operator of a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility, who has caused or is causing or has contributed or is contributing to such handling, storage, treatment, transportation, or disposal to stop such handling, storage, treatment, transportation, or disposal or to take such other action as may be necessary.
If it is not practicable to assure prompt protection of the environment or the health of humans solely by commencement of such a civil action, the director, with the concurrence of the Governor, may issue such emergency orders as may be necessary to protect the environment or the health of humans who are or may be affected by such past or present handling, storage, treatment, transportation, or disposal. Notwithstanding Code Sections 12-8-71, 12-8-72, 12-8-73, 12-8-74, 12-8-81, and 12-8-96, such order shall be immediately effective for a period of not more than 48 hours unless the director brings an action under the first sentence of this Code section before the expiration of such period.
Whenever the director brings such an action within such period, such order shall be effective for such period of time as may be authorized by the court pending litigation or thereafter.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 18; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 266, § 8; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

Cross references.

- Emergency powers of Governor generally,

§§

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

,

45-12-29

et seq.

12-8-76. Legal assistance by Attorney General.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or his representative to represent the director in all actions in connection with this article.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 22; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-77. Contracts to provide solid waste handling, reclamation, or recycling services.

Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, in order to comply with this article, with the federal act, or with applicable state and federal rules, regulations, or guidelines, or in order to be eligible for grants-in-aid and other allotments, the State of Georgia, the division, and each municipal corporation and county in this state are authorized, at the discretion of its governing authority, to enter into valid and binding contracts with each other or with private persons, firms, associations, or corporations to provide solid waste handling, reclamation, and recycling services to such private persons, firms, associations, or corporations, or to each other.

As used in this Code section, the terms "solid waste handling," "solid waste," "reclamation," and "recycling" shall be construed to have the meanings given them in Code Section 12-8-62 or in the rules and regulations effective under this article.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 19; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

Cross references.

- Authority of municipalities and counties to enter into contracts to provide industrial waste water treatment services,

§

36-60-2

.

12-8-78. Public access to information; protection of confidential information; access to confidential information by federal government and courts.

Any records, reports, or information obtained from any person by the director under this part or the rules and regulations promulgated under this part shall be available to the public for inspection and copying at the expense of the person requesting copies.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, upon a showing satisfactory to the director by any person that any records, reports, or information, or any particular part thereof, to which the director has access under this article or the rules and regulations would, if made public, divulge information entitled to protection or confidentiality under law, the director shall consider such information or any particular portion thereof confidential in accordance with the purposes of the law under which confidentiality or protection is claimed, provided that such records, reports, documents, or information may be disclosed to officers, employees, or authorized representatives of the United States government concerned with carrying out the terms of the federal act or when required by any court in any proceeding under the federal act or under this article.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 20; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

12-8-79. Effect of other laws on permits issued under article and rules and regulations.

Subject to the provisions of the Constitution of Georgia, no other law of this state and no action, ordinance, regulation, or law of any county, municipality, or other political subdivision shall operate to prevent the location or operation of a hazardous waste facility holding a valid hazardous waste facility permit issued under this article and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, provided that nothing in this Code section shall prevent any county, municipality, or other political subdivision from challenging a facility's compliance with this article or any rule or regulation, order, or permit provision or condition adopted or issued under this article.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 21; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on constitutional law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 53 (1982). For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982). For survey article on real property, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 255 (1982).

12-8-80. Applicability of article.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5, effective July 1, 1992.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127,

§

3.

12-8-81. Civil penalties; procedures for imposing penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this article, the rules or regulations effective under this article, or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this article or any person negligently or intentionally failing or refusing to comply with any final or emergency order of the director issued as provided in this article shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000.00 per day. Each day during which the violation or failure or refusal to comply continues shall be a separate violation.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of this article, any rule or regulation effective under this article, or any permit condition or has negligently or intentionally failed or refused to comply with any final order or emergency order of the director, he may upon written request cause a hearing to be conducted before a hearing officer appointed by the board. Upon finding that such person has violated any provision of this article, any rule or regulation effective under this article, or any permit condition or has negligently or intentionally failed or refused to comply with any final order or emergency order of the director, the hearing officer shall issue his decision imposing civil penalties as provided in this Code section. Such hearing and any administrative or judicial review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 12-8-73.

In rendering a decision under this Code section imposing civil penalties, the hearing officer shall consider all factors which are relevant, including, but not limited to, the following:

The amount of civil penalty necessary to ensure immediate and continued compliance and the extent to which the violator may have profited by failing or delaying to comply;

The character and degree of impact of the violation or failure on the natural resources of the state, especially any rare or unique natural phenomena;

The conduct of the person incurring the civil penalty in promptly taking all feasible steps or procedures necessary or appropriate to comply with this article or to correct the violation or failure;

Any prior violations of, or failures by, such person to comply with statutes, rules, regulations, orders, or permits administered, adopted, or issued by the director;

The character and degree of injury to or interference with public health or safety which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure; and

The character and degree of injury to or interference with reasonable use of property which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 17; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

12-8-82. Criminal penalty.

Any person who:

Knowingly transports or causes to be transported any hazardous waste as defined in this article to a facility which does not have a permit or interim status pursuant to Code Section 12-8-66, which does not have a variance pursuant to Code Section 12-8-69, or which is not subject to an order of the director which specifically authorized continued operation of such facility;

Knowingly treats, stores, or disposes of any hazardous waste as defined in this article:

Without a permit or interim status pursuant to Code Section 12-8-66, a variance pursuant to Code Section 12-8-69, or an order of the director allowing such treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste;

In knowing violation of any material condition or requirement of such permit, interim status, variance, or order; or

In knowing violation of any material condition or requirement of any applicable regulations or standards promulgated in accordance with Code Section 12-8-64;

Knowingly omits material information or makes any false material statement or representation in any application, label, manifest, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with this article or regulations promulgated in accordance with Code Section 12-8-64;

Knowingly generates, stores, treats, transports, disposes of, exports, or otherwise handles any hazardous waste as defined in this article, whether such activity took place before or takes place after March 14, 1985, and who knowingly destroys, alters, conceals, or fails to file any record, application, manifest, report, or other document required to be maintained or filed for purposes of compliance with this article or regulations promulgated in accordance with Code Section 12-8-64; or

Knowingly transports without a manifest or causes to be transported without a manifest, any hazardous waste required by this article or regulations promulgated in accordance with Code Section 12-8-64 to be accompanied by a manifest

shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than $50,000.00 for each day of violation, or imprisonment for not less than one nor more than two years, or three years in the case of a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection, or both.
If the conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction of such person under this subsection, the maximum punishment under the respective paragraphs shall be doubled with respect to both fine and imprisonment.

Any person who knowingly transports, treats, stores, disposes of, or exports any hazardous waste as defined in this article in violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section and who knows at that time that by such action another person is placed in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than $250,000.00 or imprisonment for not less than one nor more than 15 years, or both. A defendant that is an organization shall, upon conviction of violating this subsection, be subject to a fine of not more than $1 million.

An organization may be convicted for the criminal acts set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, if an agent of the organization performs the conduct which is an element of the crime while acting within the scope of such agent's office or employment and in behalf of the organization or if the commission of the criminal act set forth in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section is authorized, requested, commanded, performed, or recklessly tolerated by the board of directors of the organization or by a managerial official who is acting within the scope of such official's employment on behalf of the organization.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 266, § 10; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1101, § 4.)

12-8-83. Use of material mixed with dioxin or other hazardous waste for dust suppression or road treatment prohibited.

The use of waste or used oil or other material which is contaminated or mixed with dioxin or any other hazardous waste as defined in this article, other than a waste identified as a hazardous waste solely on the basis of ignitibility, for dust suppression or road treatment is prohibited.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 266, § 11; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

Law reviews.

-
For note, "Regulating a Toxic Chemical: The Dioxin Controversy in Georgia," see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev 717 (1993).